Utah statutes.
23-19-33.   Registration of fur dealer's agent.

Any person who is employed by a fur dealer as a fur buyer in the field, upon application to the Wildlife Board, may be registered as a fur dealer's agent.



Amended by Chapter 28, 1980 General Session

